Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.042

Vacations—State institutions of higher learning.

State institutions of higher learning may prescribe such rules and regulations as they may determine governing vacation leave for academic and professional personnel.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.042. Prior: 1955 c 140 s 3.]